Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.56.450

Delegates—Number and qualifications.

Each state representative district shall be entitled to as many delegates in the convention as it has members in the house of representatives of the state legislature. No person shall be qualified to act as a delegate in said convention who does not possess the qualifications required of representatives in the state legislature from the same district.

[ 2003 c 111 s 1434. Prior: 1965 c 9 s 29.74.050; prior: 1933 c 181 s 2; RRS s 5249-2. Formerly RCW 29.74.050.]

NOTES:

Qualifications of legislators: State Constitution Art. 2 s 7.